Utah statutes.
32B-12-302.   Notifying the department of change in ownership.

The commission may suspend or revoke a liquor warehousing license if a liquor warehouser licensee does not immediately notify the department of a change in:

(1)  ownership of the liquor warehouser licensee;

(2)  for a corporate owner, the:

(a)  corporate officers or directors; or

(b)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(3)  for a limited liability company:

(a)  managers; or

(b)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

